Utah statutes.
62A-2-108.2.   Licensing residential treatment programs -- Notification of local government.

(1) (a)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, the office shall make rules that establish categories of residential treatment licenses based on differences in the types of residential treatment programs.

(b)  The categories referred to in Subsection (1)(a) may be based on differences in:

(i)  services offered;

(ii)  types of clients served;

(iii)  risks posed to the community; or

(iv)  other factors that make regulatory differences advisable.

(2)  Subject to the requirements of federal and state law, and pursuant to the authority granted by Section 62A-2-106, the office shall establish and enforce rules that:

(a)  relate generally to all categories of residential treatment program licenses; and

(b)  relate to specific categories of residential treatment program licenses on the basis of the regulatory needs, as determined by the office, of residential treatment programs within those specific categories.

(3)  Before submitting an application for a license to operate a residential treatment program, the applicant shall serve notice of its intent to operate a residential treatment program on the governing body of:

(a)  the city in which the residential treatment program will be located; or

(b)  if the residential treatment program will be located in the unincorporated area of a county, the county in which the residential treatment program will be located.

(4)  The notice described in Subsection (3) shall include the following information relating to the residential treatment program:

(a)  an accurate description of the residential treatment program;

(b)  the location where the residential treatment program will be operated;

(c)  the services that will be provided by the residential treatment program;

(d)  the type of clients that the residential treatment program will serve;

(e)  the category of license for which the residential treatment program is applying to the office;

(f)  the name, telephone number, and address of a person that may be contacted to make inquiries about the residential treatment program; and

(g)  any other information that the office may require by rule.

(5)  When submitting an application for a license to operate a residential treatment program, the applicant shall include with the application:

(a)  a copy of the notice described in Subsection (3); and

(b)  proof that the applicant served the notice described in Subsection (3) on the governing body described in Subsection (3).



Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

